North Carolina, session 2025, SB70.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Wendell to provide
community engagement, development of construction drawings, and stabilization of the old
Carver School owned by Pleasant Grove Baptist Church in partnership with Pleasant Grove CDC
and Wake County. The project includes the rehabilitation of the site into a comprehensive
community center, including a business incubator, technology center, gymnasium, performance
space, and classrooms.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S70-v-1*